Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2677.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-1303, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-1303. Unlawful imprisonment; classification; definitions A. A person commits unlawful imprisonment by either: 1. Knowingly restraining another person. 2. If the person is at least eighteen years of age, Intentionally preventing another person who intends to engage in religious activities from entering or exiting a place of worship by physically blocking or detaining the other person or by obstructing, impeding or hindering the other person's passage by force or threat of force. B. In any prosecution for unlawful imprisonment, it is a defense that: 1. The restraint was accomplished by a peace officer or detention officer acting in good faith in the lawful performance of his duty; or 2. The defendant is a relative of the person restrained and the defendant's sole intent is to assume lawful custody of that person and the restraint was accomplished without physical injury. C. For the purpose of determining the sentence for a violation of subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section, if the offense is a felony the trier of fact shall determine and the court shall consider the aggravating circumstance under section 13-701, subsection D, paragraph 26. C. D. Unlawful imprisonment is a class 6 felony unless the victim is released voluntarily by the defendant without physical injury in a safe place before arrest in which case it is a class 1 misdemeanor. D. E. For the purposes of this section: , 1. "Detention officer" means a person other than an elected official who is employed by a county, city or town and who is responsible for the supervision, protection, care, custody or control of inmates in a county or municipal correctional institution.  Detention officer does not include counselors or secretarial, clerical or professionally trained personnel. 2. "Place of worship" has the same meaning prescribed in section 13-1422. END_STATUTE